Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2448.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 46, chapter 2, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 46-232, to read: START_STATUTE46-232. Department of economic security; supplemental nutrition assistance program; work requirement waivers; discretionary exemption prohibition A. The department of economic security may not seek, apply for, accept or renew any waiver of work requirement for able-bodied adults without dependents pursuant to 7 United States Code section 2015(o)(4) unless: 1. It is required by federal law. 2. It is authorized by state law. B. The department of economic security may not exercise this state's option to provide any exemptions from the work requirement under 7 United States Code section 2015(o)(6)(f) unless authorized by state law.END_STATUTE